test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_cuarvud_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - čuárvuđ: # MS checked
    čuárvuđ+V+Inf: čuárˊvuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čuárvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárˊvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čuárˊvoon
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čuárˊvuvettee
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čuárˊvuv
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čuárˊvup
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čuárˊvuvetteđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuárˊvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čuorˊvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čuorˊvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čuárvui
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čuárˊvoim
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čuárˊvoid
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čuárˊvoin
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čuárvuim
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čuárvuid
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čuorˊvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: čuáˊrvuččim
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: čuáˊrvuččih
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: čuáˊrvuččij
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du1: čuáˊrvuččáim
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du2: čuáˊrvuččáid
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du3: čuáˊrvuččáin
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: čuáˊrvuččijm
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čuáˊrvuččijd
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: čuáˊrvuččii
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: čuárˊvoom
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: čuárˊvooh
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: čuárvuš
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du1: čuáˊrvužeen
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du2: čuárvušvettee
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du3: čuáˊrvužává
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: čuáˊrvužep
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: čuárvušvetteđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: čuáˊrvužeh
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: čuárˊvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: čuárvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čuárvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čuárˊvoon
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čuárˊvoo
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čuárˊvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čuárˊvup
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čuárˊvuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čuárˊvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čuárvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čuárˊvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: čuáˊrvuččii
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: čuorˊvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+PrsPrc: čuárˊvoo
    čuárvuđ+V+PrfPrc: čuárˊvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio: čuárˊvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Ess: čuárˊvumin
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Loc: čuárˊvumist
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Ill: čuárˊvumân
    čuárvuđ+V+Ger: čuáˊrvudijn
    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuáˊrvuhennáá
    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuáˊrvuhinnáá
    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuáˊrvuhánnáá


  Verb - uážžuđ: # MS checked
    uážžuđ+V+Inf: uážˊžuđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uážum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uážuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uážˊžu
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uážˊžoon
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uážˊžuvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uážˊžuv
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uážˊžup
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uážˊžuvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uážˊžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ožžum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ožžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uážui
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: uážˊžoim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: uážˊžoid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: uážˊžoin
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: uážuim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uážuid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ožžuu
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: uáˊžuččim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: uáˊžuččih
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: uáˊžuččij
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du1: uáˊžuččáim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du2: uáˊžuččáid
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du3: uáˊžuččáin
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: uáˊžuččijm
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: uáˊžuččijd
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: uáˊžuččii
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: uážˊžoom
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: uážˊžooh
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: uážuš
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du1: uáˊžužeen
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du2: uážušvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du3: uáˊžužává
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: uáˊžužep
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: uážušvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: uáˊžužeh
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: uážˊžum
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uážu
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uážus
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uážˊžoon
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uážˊžoo
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uážˊžus
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uážˊžup
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uážˊžuđ
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uážˊžus
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uážu
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uážˊžum
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: uáˊžuččii
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: ožˊžuu
    uážžuđ+V+PrsPrc: uážˊžoo
    uážžuđ+V+PrfPrc: uážˊžum
    uážžuđ+V+Actio: uážˊžum
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Ess: uážˊžumin
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Loc: uážˊžumist
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Ill: uážˊžumân
    uážžuđ+V+Ger: uáˊžudijn
    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uáˊžuhennáá
    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uáˊžuhinnáá
    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uáˊžuhánnáá


  Verb - kuárruđ: # MS checked
    kuárruđ+V+Inf: kuárruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáˊrum
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuáˊruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáṛu
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárˊroon
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kuáˊṛuvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kuárruv
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuárrup
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuáˊṛuvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuáṛuh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: koorrum
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: koorruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuáˊrui
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kuáˊroim
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kuáˊroid
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kuáˊroin
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kuáruim
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuáruid
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: korruu
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kuáˊruččim
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kuáˊruččih
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kuáˊruččij
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du1: kuáˊruččáim
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du2: kuáˊruččáid
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du3: kuáˊruččáin
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kuáˊruččijm
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kuáˊruččáijd
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kuáˊruččii
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kuároom
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kuárooh
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kuáruš
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du1: kuáˊružeen
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du2: kuárušvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du3: kuáˊružává
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kuáˊružep
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kuárušvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kuáˊružeh
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kuárˊrum
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kuáru
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kuárus
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kuárˊroon
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kuárˊroo
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kuárˊrus
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kuárrˊrup
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kuárrˊruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kuárˊrus
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuáru
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kuárˊrum
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kuáˊruččii
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: korruu        #?
    kuárruđ+V+PrsPrc: kuárˊroo
    kuárruđ+V+PrfPrc: kuárˊrum
    kuárruđ+V+Actio: kuárrum
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Ess: kuáṛumin
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Loc: kuáṛumist
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Ill: kuáṛumân
    kuárruđ+V+Ger: kuáˊrudijn
    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuáˊruhennáá
    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuáˊruhinnáá
    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuáˊruhánnáá
